Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1601
Agricultural extension work authorized.

In order to aid in diffusing among the people of Nebraska useful and practical information on subjects relating to agriculture, home economics, and rural life and to encourage the application of the same, there may be inaugurated, in each of the several counties of the State of Nebraska, extension work which shall be carried on in cooperation with the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources and the United States Department of Agriculture as provided in the Act of Congress of May 8, 1914.

Laws 1939, c. 1, § 1, p. 53;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-2001;

R.S.1943, § 2-1601;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 27.